Georgia statutes. 
Am. Jur. 2d. - 26 Am. Jur. 2d, Eminent Domain, § 298. 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets, and Bridges, § 307.

C.J.S. - 29A C.J.S., Eminent Domain, § 361. 40 C.J.S., Highways, § 467 et seq. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1281.

ALR. - Qualification of owner of property affected by public improvement to act in making assessment, 2 A.L.R. 1207.

Loss of right to contest assessment in proceeding for street or sewer improvement by waiver, estoppel, or the like, 9 A.L.R. 634.

Loss of right to contest assessment in drainage proceeding by waiver, estoppel, or the like, 9 A.L.R. 842.

Validity of promise based on invalid paving assessment, 20 A.L.R. 1326.

Validity of assessment for local improvement as affected by contingency upon which the award of a contract for a related improvement is dependent, 29 A.L.R. 832.

Excessiveness or unfairness of assessment for highway improvement on property of railroad company, 48 A.L.R. 497.

Assessments for improvements by the front-foot rule, 56 A.L.R. 941.

Necessity that additional assessment in proceeding for local improvement precede incurring liability in excess of the original assessment, 63 A.L.R. 1179.

Validity of ad valorem tax for highway purposes without attempt to apportion on basis of benefits, 72 A.L.R. 1103.

Liability of abutting property to assessment for street paving as affected by character or extent of traffic, 73 A.L.R. 1295.

Classification as regards counties or other political divisions permissible in statute imposing cost of construction or maintenance of highways upon property specially benefited, 77 A.L.R. 1285.

Lump-sum assessment for taxes or public improvement against property owned by cotenants in undivided shares, 80 A.L.R. 862.

Statute authorizing or requiring reassessment for public improvement when original assessment is invalid or void as applicable when proceedings leading to original assessment were without jurisdiction, 83 A.L.R. 1190.

Public property as subject to special assessment for improvement, 90 A.L.R. 1137.

Power and duty to include in a periodical special assessment the amount of a deficiency for a previous period resulting from delinquent assessments which may eventually be paid, 96 A.L.R. 1275.

Diversion of traffic into business district by opening new route as special benefit for which assessment may be made, 96 A.L.R. 1380.

Property unit for purposes of assessment for street or other local improvement as affected by owner's disregard of original lot lines or creation of new ones, 104 A.L.R. 1049.

Duration of lien of special assessment and period of limitation of action for its enforcement as affected by adoption of installment plan of payment, 114 A.L.R. 399.

Personal liability of property owner to pay assessments for local improvements, 127 A.L.R. 551; 167 A.L.R. 1030.

Constitutionality of classification of streets as regards source of payment for improvements, 127 A.L.R. 1090.

Applicability of statute of limitations to action to enforce special assessments as affected by question whether imposition or enforcement of the assessment is an exercise of a governmental function, 136 A.L.R. 572.

Manner of enforcing special assessments against public property, 150 A.L.R. 1394.

Unimproved strip or area separating property from improved portion of street as affecting assessability of property for street improvement, 166 A.L.R. 1083.

Validity and effect of agreement by property owners or occupants to pay cost of, or assessment against property for, local improvement, 167 A.L.R. 1030.

Power to include in special assessment interest accruing during the construction of the public improvement and running until the special assessments therefor become due, 58 A.L.R.2d 1343.

Liability with respect to improvement assessments or charges as between vendor and purchaser, 59 A.L.R.2d 1044.

Exclusiveness of method prescribed by statute or ordinance for enforcement of special assessment for public improvement or service, 88 A.L.R.2d 1250.

What property "abuts" on improvement so as to be subject to assessment, 97 A.L.R.2d 1079.

Duty as between life tenant and remainderman as respects payment of improvement assessments, 10 A.L.R.3d 1309.

Exemption of public school property from assessments for local improvements, 15 A.L.R.3d 847.

36-39-5. Improvements when county owns abutting property.

Statute text

Whenever the abutting landowners of any street of the municipal corporation petition the governing body as set out in subsection (b) of Code Section 36-39-3 or whenever the governing body passes the resolution provided for in subsection (a) of Code Section 36-39-3 for the improvement of any street, where the county is owner of property on the street and where the governing body of the county has assented to the proposed improvement and has provided funds to pay in cash its proportionate part of the cost of the improvement, the frontage so owned shall be counted as if owned by an individual for all the purposes of this chapter. The chairman of the board of commissioners of the county is authorized to sign the petition or file objections in behalf of the county.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 13; Ga. L. 1933, § 69-425.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Public property as subject to special assessment for improvement, 90 A.L.R. 1137.

Manner of enforcing special assessments against public property, 150 A.L.R. 1394.

36-39-6. Paving by railroad having tracks in street.

Statute text

Any railroad or street railway having tracks located in a street at the time of a proposed improvement shall be required by the governing body to pave the width of its tracks and two feet on each side thereof. Such paving shall be done with the same material and in the same manner as the rest of the street to be paved, provided that the governing body may require such paving to be of a different material and manner of construction when, in its judgment, this is rendered necessary by the uses of the street by the railway. The work shall be performed under the supervision and subject to the approval of the city's municipal corporation's engineer. If the railway, within a period of 30 days after receipt of the notice to do such work, does not agree in writing to comply with such order or if the work is not completed to the satisfaction of the municipal corporation's engineer within such time as may be prescribed by the governing body, the governing body may have the work done and may charge the cost and expense thereof to the railway company. The governing body shall have a lien against the railway company for such cost and expense. Such lien shall have the same rank and priority and shall be enforced in the same manner as the liens provided for in Code Section 36-39-20.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 5; Code 1933, § 69-405; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets, and Bridges, §§ 307, 328.

C.J.S. - 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1499, 1503.

ALR. - Paving ordinance as impairment of obligation of street railway franchise, 10 A.L.R. 897.

Liability of railroad or street railway which paves or is liable for paving occupied portion of street to assessment for improvement of remainder, 29 A.L.R. 679.

Duty of street railway to keep street in repair as affected by change in traffic conditions, 33 A.L.R. 131.

36-39-7. Payment for street improvements and construction of water, gas, and sewer connections; payment of costs of connections.

Statute text

Whenever the petition provided for in subsection (b) of Code Section 36-39-3 is presented or when the governing body has determined to improve any street and has passed the resolution provided for in subsection (a) of Code Section 36-39-3, the governing body shall have the power to enact all such ordinances and to establish all such rules and regulations as may be necessary to require the owners of all the property abutting on the improvement and of any railway in the street to pay the cost of such improvement and to cause to be put in and constructed all water, gas, or sewer pipe connections to connect with any existing water, gas, or sewer pipes in and underneath the streets where such improvement is to be made. All cost and expense of making water, gas, or sewer pipe connections shall be taxed solely against the property abutting on the improvement; but such cost and expense shall be included and made a part of the general assessment to cover the cost of the improvement.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 6; Code 1933, § 69-406.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, § 181 et seq.

C.J.S. - 39A C.J.S., Highways, § 43 et seq. 40 C.J.S., Highways, § 250 et seq.

ALR. - Construction of provision of statute, ordinance, or franchise relating to "repair" of street railway zone, 10 A.L.R. 928.

Eligibility of public officer or employee to appointment as member of body to lay assessments for public improvement, 71 A.L.R. 540.

Power to include in special assessment interest accruing during the construction of the public improvement and running until the special assessments therefor become due, 58 A.L.R.2d 1343.

36-39-8. Resolution letting contract for improvements following time for protests or filing of petition.

Statute text

After the expiration of the time for objection or protest on the part of the property owners, if no sufficient protest is filed, or on receipt of a petition for an improvement signed by the owners of a majority of the frontage of the land to be assessed, if the petition is found to be in proper form and properly executed, the governing body shall adopt a resolution reciting that no protest has been filed or that a petition was filed, as the case may be, and expressing the determination of the governing body to proceed with the improvement. The resolution shall state the kind of improvement, define the extent and character of the same, and specify such other matters as may be necessary to instruct the engineer employed by the municipal corporation in the performance of his or her duties in preparing for such improvement the necessary plans, plats, profiles, specifications, and estimates. The resolution shall set forth any and all such reasonable terms and conditions as the governing body deems proper to impose with reference to the letting of the contract and the provisions thereof. The governing body, by such resolution, shall provide that the contractor shall execute to the municipal corporation a good and sufficient bond, as provided in Part 3 of Article 3 of Chapter 91 of this title, and may also require a bond in an amount to be stated in the resolution for the maintenance of the good condition of the improvements for a period of not less than five years from the time of completion, in the discretion of the governing body. The resolution shall also direct the clerk of the municipal corporation to advertise for sealed proposals for furnishing the materials and performing the work necessary in making such improvements.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 7; Code 1933, § 69-407; Ga. L. 1952, p. 310, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 11.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets, and Bridges, §§ 34 et seq., 106 et seq.

C.J.S. - 40 C.J.S., Highways, §§ 265, 325. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1225.

36-39-9. Work performed by municipal corporation; property owners' objections to performance of work by municipal corporation.

Statute text

As an alternative to contracting for the improvement, the governing body shall have the right, at its option and in its discretion, to provide that the work necessary in making the improvement shall be done by the municipal corporation itself. In such event, the municipal corporation shall procure all materials, provide the machinery and equipment, and do all of the work necessary in making such improvement. If the governing body determines that the municipal corporation shall itself do the work necessary in making the improvement, the resolution expressing the determination of the governing body to proceed with the improvement shall so state; and such resolution shall fix a time and place at which the owners of the property affected by the proposed improvement shall have the right to file objections thereto. Notice of the resolution and of the intention of the governing body to cause the work to be done by the municipal corporation shall be published in at least six consecutive issues of a daily paper having a general circulation in the municipal corporation or once a week for two weeks in the newspaper in which the sheriff's advertisements for the county in which the municipal corporation is situated are published. The notice shall set out the time and place at which objections may be filed, which time shall be not less than ten days following the last publication of the notice. The owners of the lots or parcels of land fronting or abutting upon any street or portion thereof upon which such improvement is proposed to be made shall have the right, within the time prescribed, to file written objections to the performance of the work by the municipal corporation. In the event that the owners of a majority of the lineal frontage of the lots or parcels of land fronting or abutting upon any such street or portion thereof object to the doing of the work by the municipal corporation, the work shall be done under contract and the governing body shall proceed in the manner provided in this chapter for the letting of the work under contract. If no objections are filed by the owners of a majority of the lineal frontage of the lots or parcels of land fronting or abutting on any such street or portion thereof within the time prescribed, the municipal corporation itself shall proceed with the doing of the work necessary in making the improvement. Where the work of making the improvement is done by the municipal corporation, the cost thereof shall include the entire cost of all materials used and labor done in the performance of the work, shall include a reasonable rental for the use of machinery, equipment, and materials used in the doing of the work, and shall also include all engineering, legal, and other expenses incurred in connection with the doing of the work or the proceedings under which the same is done. When the work of making the improvement is done by the municipal corporation, the provisions of Code Section 36-39-8 relating to the letting of a contract and the provisions of Code Sections 36-39-10 and 36-39-11 shall not apply.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 7; Code 1933, § 69-407; Ga. L. 1952, p. 310, § 1.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets, and Bridges, §§ 34 et seq., 106 et seq.

C.J.S. - 40 C.J.S., Highways, §§ 265, 325. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1223.

ALR. - What constitutes newspaper of "general circulation" within meaning of state statutes requiring publication of official notices and the like in such newspaper, 24 A.L.R.4th 822.

36-39-10. Publication and contents of notice of contract proposals.

Statute text

The notice of the proposals specified in Code Section 36-39-8 shall be published in at least six consecutive issues of a daily paper or at least two issues of a weekly paper having a general circulation in the municipal corporation. The notice shall state the street or streets to be improved, the kinds of improvements proposed, what bond or bonds will be required to be executed by the contractor, the time when and the place where the sealed proposals shall be filed, and when and where the same will be considered by the governing body.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 7; Code 1933, § 69-408.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Presumption of acceptance of assessment terms. - When no objection to the assessment or prior proceedings was made by the property owner as provided in the act, and when no action was filed to enjoin the assessment or the improvement within 30 days after the passage of the ordinance making such assessment final, the property owner will be presumed to have accepted the terms thereof and to have agreed that the assessment provided for in the act may be made. City of La Grange v. Frosolona, 52 Ga. App. 232, 183 S.E. 99 (1935).

Cited in Carter v. City of Toccoa, 210 Ga. 167, 78 S.E.2d 487 (1953).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets, and Bridges, §§ 37, 38. 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Works and Contracts, § 52 et seq.

C.J.S. - 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1368 et seq.

ALR. - What constitutes newspaper of "general circulation" within meaning of state statutes requiring publication of official notices and the like in such newspaper, 24 A.L.R.4th 822.

36-39-11. Examination of bids and award of contract; readvertisement for bids.

Statute text

At the time and place specified in the notice provided for in Code Section 36-39-10, the governing body shall examine all bids received. Without unnecessary delay, the contract shall be awarded to the lowest and best bidder, who will perform the work and furnish the materials which may be selected and perform all the conditions imposed by the governing body as prescribed in the resolutions and notice for proposals. The governing body shall have the right to reject any and all bids and readvertise for other bids when the bids submitted are not, in its judgment, satisfactory.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 7; Code 1933, § 69-409.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Works and Contracts, § 72 et seq.

C.J.S. - 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1364 et seq.

ALR. - Validity of promise based on invalid paving assessment, 20 A.L.R. 1326.

Right of municipality to exact of contractor additional consideration as condition of extension of time for completion of improvements, 71 A.L.R. 904.

Right of public authorities to reject all bids for public work or contract, 31 A.L.R.2d 469.

Public contracts: authority of state or its subdivision to reject all bids, 52 A.L.R.4th 186.

Public contracts: low bidder's monetary relief against state or local agency for nonaward of contract, 65 A.L.R.4th 93.

Encroachment of trees, shrubbery, or other vegetation across boundary line, 65 A.L.R.4th 603.

36-39-12. Appointment of board of appraisers to appraise and apportion cost.

Statute text

After the contract has been let or after the improvement has been made by the municipal corporation, in the event the governing body elects to have the work done by the municipal corporation, and after the cost for such improvement, which shall include all other expenses incurred by the municipal corporation incident to the improvement in addition to the contract price for the work and materials or in addition to the cost of all materials, labor, machinery, equipment, and services used in the making of each improvement, in the event the work is done by the municipal corporation, has been ascertained, the governing body shall, by resolution, appoint a board of appraisers, consisting of three members, to appraise and apportion the cost and expense of the same to the several tracts of land abutting on the improvement as provided in Code Sections 36-39-4 and 36-39-6.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 8; Code 1933, § 69-410; Ga. L. 1952, p. 310, § 2.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, §§ 7, 60, 87 et seq., 113.

C.J.S. - 40 C.J.S., Highways, §§ 470, 471. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1584.

36-39-13. Filing of board of appraisers' report.

Statute text

Within 30 days from the date of the resolution appointing the board of appraisers, such board shall file with the clerk of the municipal corporation a written report of the appraisal and the assessment and cost upon the several lots and tracts of land abutting on such street, as well as upon the property of any street or steam railway whose tracks are located in such street where such railway has failed or refused to do the paving as provided in Code Section 36-39-6 when and as required by the governing body.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 8; Code 1933, § 69-411.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, § 129.

C.J.S. - 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1587.

36-39-14. Hearing upon board of appraisers' report; review of report and objections; ordinance fixing assessments; taxation of interest.

Statute text

When the report of the appraisers has been returned and filed, the governing body shall appoint a time for the holding of a session or shall designate a regular meeting of its body for the hearing of any complaints or objections that may be made by any interested person concerning the appraisal, apportionment, and assessment. Notice of such session for the hearing shall be published by the clerk of the governing body once a week for two weeks in a newspaper having a general circulation in the municipal corporation. The notice shall provide for an inspection of the return by any property owner or other party interested in such return. The time fixed for the hearing shall be not less than five nor more than ten days from the date of the last publication of the notice. The governing body at the session shall have the power and duty to review and correct the appraisal, apportionment, and assessment, to hear objections to the same, and to confirm the same either as made by the board or as corrected by the governing body. The governing body, by ordinance, shall fix the assessment in accordance with the appraisal and apportionment, as so confirmed, against the several tracts of land liable therefor. The rate of interest to be taxed shall not exceed 1 percent per annum over and above the rate of interest stipulated in the bonds provided for in this chapter.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 8; Code 1933, § 69-412.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Presumption of acceptance of assessment terms. - When no objection to the assessment or prior proceedings was made by the property owner as provided in the act, and when no action was filed to enjoin the assessment or the improvement within 30 days after the passage of the ordinance making such assessment final, the property owner will be presumed to have accepted the terms thereof and to have agreed that the assessment provided for in the act may be made. City of La Grange v. Frosolona, 52 Ga. App. 232, 183 S.E. 99 (1935).

Cited in Carter v. City of Toccoa, 210 Ga. 167, 78 S.E.2d 487 (1953).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, § 135 et seq.

C.J.S. - 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1589 et seq., 1671, 1675, 1676, 1682.

ALR. - Qualification of owner of property affected by public improvement to act in making assessment, 2 A.L.R. 1207.

Loss of right to contest assessment in proceeding for street or sewer improvement by waiver, estoppel, or the like, 9 A.L.R. 634.

Loss of right to contest assessment in drainage proceeding by waiver, estoppel, or the like, 9 A.L.R. 842.

Inclusion in assessment for public improvement of amount to cover delinquencies as contrary to constitutional guaranties, 40 A.L.R. 1352; 42 A.L.R. 1185.

Eligibility of public officer or employee to appointment as member of body to lay assessments for public improvement, 71 A.L.R. 540.

Failure of property owner to avail himself of remedy provided by statute or ordinance as precluding attack based on improper inclusion of property in, or exclusion of property from, assessment, 100 A.L.R. 1292.

Exclusiveness of method prescribed by statute or ordinance for enforcement of special assessment for public improvement or service, 88 A.L.R.2d 1250.

What constitutes newspaper of "general circulation" within meaning of state statutes requiring publication of official notices and the like in such newspaper, 24 A.L.R.4th 822.

36-39-15. Time and manner of payment of assessments generally.

Statute text

Assessment in conformity to the appraisal and apportionment as confirmed by the municipal corporation shall be payable to the treasurer of the municipal corporation in cash. If paid within 30 days from the date of the passage of the ordinance, such assessment shall be without interest.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 8; Code 1933, § 69-413.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, § 168.

ALR. - Loss of right to contest assessment in proceeding for street or sewer improvement by waiver, estoppel, or the like, 9 A.L.R. 634.

Loss of right to contest assessment in drainage proceeding by waiver, estoppel, or the like, 9 A.L.R. 842.

Liability of municipality in consequence of its inability, refusal, or failure to collect the cost of local improvements from the property benefited, 51 A.L.R. 973; 172 A.L.R. 1030.

Power of municipality to transfer or assign its right to enforce assessment or lien for local improvements, 55 A.L.R. 667.

Right of taxpayer to anticipate payment of tax or special improvement assessment or deferred installments thereof, 96 A.L.R. 1475.

Personal liability of property owner to pay assessments for local improvements, 127 A.L.R. 551; 167 A.L.R. 1030.

Manner of enforcing special assessments against public property, 150 A.L.R. 1394.

36-39-16. Payment of assessment in installments.

Statute text

If the owner of the land or of any street railway assessed, within 30 days from the passage of the ordinance making the assessment final, files with the clerk of the municipal corporation his written request asking that the assessments be payable in installments in accordance with the provisions of this Code section, the same shall thereupon be and become payable in equal annual installments over such period of years, not less than two nor more than ten, as shall be fixed and prescribed by the governing body of the municipal corporation. Such installments shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding 7 percent per annum until paid. Each installment, together with the interest on the entire amount remaining unpaid, shall be payable each year at such time and place as shall be provided by resolution of the governing body.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 8; Code 1933, § 69-414; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1539, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1078, § 1.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, §§ 169, 170.

C.J.S. - 40 C.J.S., Highways, § 475 et seq. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1737, 1742.

ALR. - Right of taxpayer to anticipate payment of tax or special improvement assessment or deferred installments thereof, 96 A.L.R. 1475.

Duration of lien of special assessment and period of limitation of action for its enforcement as affected by adoption of installment plan of payment, 114 A.L.R. 399.

Personal liability of property owner to pay assessments for local improvements, 127 A.L.R. 551; 167 A.L.R. 1030.

Manner of enforcing special assessments against public property, 150 A.L.R. 1394.

36-39-17. Assessments where portion of costs paid by municipal corporation.

Statute text

When the municipal corporation desires to pay any portion of the cost of the improvements contemplated in this chapter in addition to the amounts otherwise provided for, the balance may be assessed against the abutting property or the owners thereof or against the owners of any street or steam railway therein, as provided in this chapter.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 15; Code 1933, § 69-427.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, § 90.

C.J.S. - 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1517, 1520, 1521.

36-39-18. Additional assessments.

Statute text

If any assessment is found to be invalid or insufficient in whole or in part for any reason whatsoever, the governing body may at any time, in the manner provided for the making of an original assessment, proceed to cause a new assessment to be made and fixed. The new assessment shall have the same force and effect as an original assessment.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 12; Code 1933, § 69-415.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in City of La Grange v. Pound, 50 Ga. App. 219, 177 S.E. 762 (1934).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, § 131 et seq.

C.J.S. - 40 C.J.S., Highways, § 474. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1704 et seq., 1725.

ALR. - Inclusion in assessment for public improvement of amount to cover delinquencies as contrary to constitutional guaranties, 42 A.L.R. 1185.

Necessity that additional assessment in proceeding for local improvement precede incurring liability in excess of the original assessment, 63 A.L.R. 1179.

Personal liability of property owner to pay assessments for local improvements, 127 A.L.R. 551; 167 A.L.R. 1030.

Manner of enforcing special assessments against public property, 150 A.L.R. 1394.

36-39-19. Publication and contents of notice of due date of assessment; effect of failure to publish notice.

Statute text

It shall be the duty of the treasurer, not less than 30 days and not more than 50 days before the maturity of any installment of the assessments, to publish at least one time, in a newspaper having a general circulation in the municipal corporation, a notice advising the owner of the property affected by the assessment of the date when such installment and interest will be due, designating the street or streets or other public places for the improvement of which such assessments have been levied and stating that, unless the installment and interest are promptly paid, proceedings will be taken to collect such installment and interest. In lieu of the publication, the treasurer may mail the notice within the time limits aforesaid to the owners of record of the property affected, at their last known address. The failure of the treasurer or clerk to publish or mail the notice of maturity of any installment of the assessment and interest shall in no wise affect the validity of the assessment and interest and the execution issued therefor.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 11; Code 1933, § 69-420.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Power and duty to include in a periodical special assessment the amount of a deficiency for a previous period resulting from delinquent assessments which may eventually be paid, 96 A.L.R. 1275.

Personal liability of property owner to pay assessments for local improvements, 127 A.L.R. 551; 167 A.L.R. 1030.

Manner of enforcing special assessments against public property, 150 A.L.R. 1394.

What constitutes newspaper of "general circulation" within meaning of state statutes requiring publication of official notices and the like in such newspaper, 24 A.L.R.4th 822.

36-39-20. Lien for assessment and interest.

Statute text

The assessment and each installment thereof, along with the interest thereon and the expense of collection, are declared to be a lien against the lots and tracts of land so assessed, from the date of the ordinance levying the same, coequal with the lien of other taxes and prior to and superior to all other liens against such lots or tracts. Such lien shall continue until the assessment and the interest thereon are fully paid and shall be enforced in the same manner as are liens for municipal corporation taxes.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 9; Code 1933, § 69-416.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Priority of lien coequal with tax lien. Paulk v. City of Ocilla, 188 Ga. 69, 2 S.E.2d 642 (1939).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, §§ 171 et seq., 226.

C.J.S. - 40 C.J.S., Highways, § 475 et seq. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1726, 1734, 1742.

ALR. - Priority as between lien of taxes and lien of special assessments, 65 A.L.R. 1379.

Assessment for local improvements as taxes within statute providing for payment of taxes out of proceeds of judicial sale, 73 A.L.R. 1227.

Priority as between liens for public improvements, 99 A.L.R. 1478.

Action by municipality to enforce lien for special assessment as within statute of limitations not specifically covering it, 103 A.L.R. 885.

Constitutionality of statute giving to lien for alteration of property pursuant to public requirement, mechanics' lien or similar lien, preference over preexisting mortgage or other lien, 121 A.L.R. 616; 141 A.L.R. 66.

Personal liability of property owner to pay assessments for local improvements, 127 A.L.R. 551; 167 A.L.R. 1030.

Applicability of statute of limitations to action to enforce special assessments as affected by question whether imposition or enforcement of the assessment is an exercise of a governmental function, 136 A.L.R. 572.

Manner of enforcing special assessments against public property, 150 A.L.R. 1394.

Easement, servitude, or restrictive covenant as affected by enforcement of assessment or improvement liens, 26 A.L.R.2d 873.

36-39-21. Execution, levy, and sale on unpaid assessments or interest generally.

Statute text

It shall be the duty of the treasurer, within 15 days after the date of the maturity of any installment of assessment or interest, to issue an execution against the lot or tract of land assessed for the improvement or against the party or person owning the same for the amount of the assessment or interest. The treasurer shall turn over the same to the marshal or chief of police of the municipal corporation or his deputy, who shall levy the same upon the abutting real estate liable for the assessment and previously assessed for the improvements. After advertisement and other proceedings as in case of sales for city taxes, the real estate shall be sold at public outcry to the highest bidder. Such sales shall vest an absolute title in the purchaser, subject to the lien of the remaining unpaid installments with interest and also subject to the right of redemption as provided in Article 3 of Chapter 4 of Title 48.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 11; Code 1933, § 69-421.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Executions to enforce collection of amounts due municipality for paving streets or alleys, or laying sewers and drains, § 48-5-358.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in City of Waycross v. Cullens, 190 Ga. 823, 10 S.E.2d 920 (1940).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, §§ 181, 182, 188 et seq.

C.J.S. - 40 C.J.S., Highways, § 475 et seq. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1772, 1773. 82 C.J.S., Statutes, § 395 et seq.

ALR. - Character of action or proceeding in which purchaser at invalid sale for taxes or local improvement assessment may secure reimbursement from owner; and provisions of decree or judgment as to relief, 86 A.L.R. 1208.

Personal liability of property owner to pay assessments for local improvements, 127 A.L.R. 551; 167 A.L.R. 1030.

Right of mortgagor or purchaser of equity of redemption to defeat lien of mortgage by acquisition of title at sale subsequent to mortgage for nonpayment of taxes, or of assessment for local improvement, 134 A.L.R. 289.

Manner of enforcing special assessments against public property, 150 A.L.R. 1394.

Exclusiveness of method prescribed by statute or ordinance for enforcement of special assessment for public improvement or service, 88 A.L.R.2d 1250.

36-39-22. Affidavit contesting amount of execution; trial by superior court; penalties for delay.

Statute text

The defendant shall have the right to file an affidavit denying that the whole or any part of the amount for which the execution issued is due and stating what amount he admits to be due, which amount so admitted to be due shall be paid and collected before the affidavit is received and the affidavit shall be received for the balance. All affidavits, including those filed by railroads or street railways against whom execution is issued for the cost and expense of paving, shall set out in detail the reasons why the affiant claims the amount is not due. When received by the municipal marshal or chief of police, such affidavits shall be returned to the superior court of the county wherein the municipal corporation is located. They shall be tried and the issue shall be determined as in cases of illegality, subject to all the pains and penalties provided for in other cases of illegality for delay under the laws of this state.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 11; Code 1933, § 69-423.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

General rule is that all presumptions are in favor of validity of assessments for local improvements, and while these presumptions are not conclusive, the burden is on the party attacking the validity of an assessment to show that the assessment is invalid. City of La Grange v. Frosolona, 52 Ga. App. 232, 183 S.E. 99 (1935).

Burden of proof upon plaintiff. - On the trial of an illegality interposed to an execution levied on abutting real estate for an unpaid paving assessment, the burden is upon the plaintiff in execution to make out a prima facie case, and this is done by putting in evidence an execution fair on the execution's face and a legal levy entered thereon. City of La Grange v. Frosolona, 52 Ga. App. 232, 183 S.E. 99 (1935).

Cited in City of La Grange v. Pound, 50 Ga. App. 219, 177 S.E. 762 (1934).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, § 205 et seq.

C.J.S. - 40 C.J.S., Highways, § 474 et seq. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1682, 1699.

ALR. - Personal liability of property owner to pay assessments for local improvements, 127 A.L.R. 551; 167 A.L.R. 1030.

Manner of enforcing special assessments against public property, 150 A.L.R. 1394.

36-39-23. Collection and use of assessments generally; special fund; treasurer's bond.

Statute text

The assessment provided for and levied under this chapter shall be payable as the several installments become due, together with the interest thereon, to the treasurer of the municipal corporation, who shall keep an accurate account of all such collections made by him. Such collections shall be kept in a special fund, to be used and applied for the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon and the expenses incurred incident thereto and for no other purpose until all the bonds are paid in full. The treasurer shall give bond in an amount to be fixed by the governing body, conditioned upon the faithful performance by him of the duties imposed in this chapter.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 11; Code 1933, § 69-422.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 40 C.J.S., Highways, § 467. 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2091 et seq.

ALR. - Personal liability of property owner to pay assessments for local improvements, 127 A.L.R. 551; 167 A.L.R. 1030.

Applicability of statute of limitations to action to enforce special assessments as affected by question whether imposition or enforcement of the assessment is an exercise of a governmental function, 136 A.L.R. 572.

Manner of enforcing special assessments against public property, 150 A.L.R. 1394.

36-39-24. Limitation period for contesting or enjoining assessments.

Statute text
